Massachusetts, session 194th, S454.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of elementary
and secondary education, in partnership with at least 1 public institution of higher education,
local educational authorities and private educational providers, shall study the delivery of
education and services for students with disabilities pursuant to chapter 71B of the General Laws
and all applicable federal laws, including the Individuals with Disabilities Educational Act of
1990 and section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, to provide an intersectional
understanding of the current delivery of education and services for students with disabilities, best
practices and appropriate placement and use for best practices.
The study shall include: (i) a consideration of the social and societal impacts on the
diagnosis of students with disabilities including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, gender,
of 2

immigration status, parents’ education background and socioeconomic status; (ii) a
comprehensive evaluation of existing and potential models for providing education and services
for students with disabilities, in both inclusive in-district and out-of-district settings and the
associated costs and benefits including, but not limited to, the costs of personnel compensation,
transportation, housing, specialized services and supports and assistive technologies; and (iii)
proposed means by which individualized instruction may be provided in an inclusive manner to
all students. The department shall submit its recommendations, together with any proposed
legislative necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, by filing the same with the joint
committee on education and the clerks of the senate and house of representatives not later than
May 1, 2026.
of 2